Hawaii statutes.
[§353-132] System; requirements.
(a) The department shall establish a statewide automated victim information
and notification system to:

(1) Automatically notify a registered victim or
concerned member of the community, via the person's choice of telephone, text
message, or electronic mail transmission when the offender who is in the
custody of the department:

(A) Is transferred or assigned to another
facility;

(B) Is transferred to the custody of another
agency outside the State;

(C) Is released on temporary leave or for
other reasons;

(D) Is discharged; or

(E) Has escaped;

(2) Automatically notify a registered victim or
concerned member of the community via the person's choice of telephone, text
message, or electronic mail transmission when:

(A) The offender has an upcoming parole
hearing; or

(B) There is a change in the offender's
parole status, including a change in the offender's supervision status;

(3) Permit a victim or concerned member of the
community to receive the most recent status report for the offender in the
custody of the department by calling the system on a toll-free telephone
number, as well as by accessing the system via a public website;

(4) Provide all victims or concerned members of the
community calling the system with the option to receive live operator
assistance with the system on a twenty-four-hours per day,
three-hundred-sixty-five-days per year basis; and

(5) Permit a victim or a concerned member of the
community to register or update the person's registration information for the
system by calling a toll-free telephone number or accessing a public website.

(b) The prosecuting agency shall notify the
victim of the victim's right to register in the system. It shall be the
responsibility of the victim to register with the system. [L 2012, c 190, pt of
§1]

Note

L 2012, c 190, §4 provides:

"SECTION 4. The department of public safety shall
continue to operate the statewide automated victim information and notification
system pursuant to the funding structure under which it operated on June 30,
2012, which may include the use of federal funds, until such time as the
automated victim information and notification system special fund has
accumulated sufficient moneys to carry out the purposes of this Act."

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next